Utah statutes.
78B-6-129.   Postplacement adoptive evaluations.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsections (2) and (3), a postplacement evaluation shall be conducted and submitted to the court prior to the final hearing in an adoption proceeding.  The postplacement evaluation shall include:

(a)  verification of the allegations of fact contained in the petition for adoption;

(b)  an evaluation of the progress of the child's placement in the adoptive home; and

(c)  a recommendation regarding whether the adoption is in the best interest of the child.

(2)  The exemptions from and requirements for evaluations, described in Subsections 78B-6-128(1)(c), (2)(c), (6), and (8), also apply to postplacement adoptive evaluations.

(3)  Upon the request of the petitioner, the court may waive the postplacement adoptive evaluation, unless it determines that it is in the best interest of the child to require the postplacement evaluation.  Except where the child to be adopted and the prospective parent are related as set forth in Subsection 78B-6-128(1)(c), the court may waive the postplacement adoptive evaluation for a child who has a special need as defined in Section 62A-4a-902.

